test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_ciermih_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čiermih: # ok 1B d-kk,  rm-rm
    čiermih+N+Sg+Nom: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Gen: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Acc: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Ill: čiermihân
    čiermih+N+Sg+Loc: čiermihist
    čiermih+N+Sg+Com: čiermiháin
    čiermih+N+Sg+Abe: čiermihttáá
    čiermih+N+Ess: čiermihin
    čiermih+N+Par: čiermihid
    čiermih+N+Pl+Nom: čiermiheh
    čiermih+N+Pl+Gen: čiermihij
    čiermih+N+Pl+Acc: čiermihijd
    čiermih+N+Pl+Ill: čiermiháid
    čiermih+N+Pl+Loc: čiermihijn
    čiermih+N+Pl+Com: [čiermihijguin, čiermihijgijn]
    čiermih+N+Pl+Abe: čiermihijttáá

  #Noun - saalâs: # generated from FST, to be proofread; MLO checked, but does not belong here, I think
  #  saalâs+N+Sg+Nom: saalâs
  #  saalâs+N+Sg+Gen: saallâs
  #  saalâs+N+Sg+Ill: salâsân
  #  saalâs+N+Sg+Loc: salâsist
  #  saalâs+N+Sg+Com: salâsáin
  #  saalâs+N+Sg+Abe: saallâsttáá
  #  saalâs+N+Ess: salâsin
  #  saalâs+N+Par: salâsid
  #  saalâs+N+Pl+Nom: salâseh
  #  saalâs+N+Pl+Gen: salâsij
  #  saalâs+N+Pl+Acc: salâsijd
  #  saalâs+N+Pl+Ill: salâsáid
  #  saalâs+N+Pl+Loc: salâsijn
  #  saalâs+N+Pl+Com: [salâsijguin, salâsijgijn]
  #  saalâs+N+Pl+Abe: salâsijttáá
